Hawaii statutes.
§11-118 Vacancies; new candidates;
insertion of names on ballots. (a) In case of death, withdrawal, or
disqualification of any party candidate, the vacancy so caused may be filled by
the party. The party shall be notified by the chief election officer or the
clerk in the case of a county office immediately after the death, withdrawal,
or disqualification.

(b) If the party fills the vacancy, and so
notifies the chief election officer or clerk not later than 4:30 p.m. on the
third day after the vacancy occurs, but not later than 4:30 p.m. on the
fiftieth day prior to a primary or special primary election or not later than
4:30 p.m. on the fortieth day prior to a special, general, or special general
election, the name of the replacement shall be printed in an available and
appropriate place on the ballot, not necessarily in alphabetical order;
provided that the replacement candidate fills out an application for nomination
papers, signs the proper certifications on the nomination paper, and takes
either an oath or affirmation as provided by law. If the party fails to fill
the vacancy pursuant to this subsection, no candidate's name shall be printed
on the ballot for the party for that race.

(c) If the ballots have been printed and it is
not reasonably possible to insert an alternate's name, the chief election
officer shall issue a proclamation informing the public that the votes cast for
the vacating candidate shall be counted and the results interpreted as follows:

(1) In a primary or special primary election:

(A) In partisan races, if, but for
candidate's vacancy, the vacating candidate would have been nominated pursuant
to section 12-41(a), a vacancy shall exist in the party's nomination, to be
filled in accordance with subsection (b); and

(B) In nonpartisan races, if, but for the
candidate's vacancy, the vacating candidate would have qualified as a candidate
for the general or special general election ballot pursuant to section
12-41(b), the nonpartisan candidate who received the next highest number of
votes shall be placed on the ballot; provided that the candidate also meets the
requirements of section 12-41(b);

(2) In a special, general, or special general
election, if, but for the candidate's vacancy, the vacating candidate would
have been elected, a vacancy shall exist in the office for which the race in
question was being held, to be filled in the manner provided by law for
vacancies in office arising from the failure of an elected official to serve
the official's full term because of death, withdrawal, or removal; and

(3) In any other case where, but for the candidate's
vacancy, the vacating candidate would have been deemed elected, a vacancy shall
exist in the office for which the candidate has filed, to be filled in the
manner provided by law for vacancies in office arising from the failure of an
elected official to serve the official's full term in office because of death,
withdrawal, or removal.

(d) The parties shall adopt rules to comply
with this provision, and those rules shall be submitted to the chief election
officer.

(e) The chief election officer or county clerk
in county elections may waive any or all of the foregoing requirements in
special circumstances as provided in the rules adopted by the chief election
officer.

(f) For the purposes of this section,
"party candidate" means the person or persons who would be the
candidate or candidates of the party under section 12-41(a). [L 1970, c 26, pt
of §2; am L 1973, c 217, §1(jj); am L 1980, c 247, §1; am L 1983, c 34, §16; am
L 1986, c 305, §1; am L 1990, c 7, §3; am L 2000, c 124, §1; am L 2011, c 159, §2]

Case Notes

Circuit court erred in concluding that based upon
individual's "withdrawal" from the district race, the office of
elections was authorized pursuant to §11-117 and/or this section to allow the
Republican Party three additional days to identify a "replacement"
candidate; individual could not have withdrawn individual's nomination papers
as the papers were void and should never have been accepted and filed by the
county clerk; therefore, without these additional days, replacement
individual's nomination papers were filed after the statutory deadline and
individual's name should not have been on the ballot. 126 H. 115 (App.), 267
P.3d 699 (2011).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next